Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-649
Cancer registry; sections, how construed; patient and patient's family; privacy rights.

Sections 81-642 to 81-649.02 shall not be deemed to compel any individual to submit to any medical examination or supervision by the department, any of its authorized representatives, or an approved researcher. No person who seeks information or obtains registry data pursuant to such sections or sections 81-663 to 81-675 shall contact a patient on the registry or such patient's family unless the registry has first obtained the permission of such patient or patient's family. The registry shall coordinate its activities with the person desiring such contact and may authorize the person desiring such contact to perform these contacts under the direction of the registry.

Laws 1982, LB 212, § 8;

Laws 1991, LB 703, § 74;

Laws 1993, LB 536, § 119;

Laws 2002, LB 1021, § 105;

Laws 2025, LB376, § 32.